Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0413

Voting by investor members.

If the organic rules provide for investor members, each investor member has one vote, unless the organic rules otherwise provide. The organic rules may provide for the allocation of investor member voting power by class, classes, or any combination of classes.

[ 2019 c 37 s 413.]